Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1602
Domestic subscriber, defined.

As used in sections 70-1603 to 70-1615, unless the context otherwise requires, domestic subscriber shall not include municipalities, cities, villages, political subdivisions, companies, corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, or businesses of any nature.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2703;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 417.